District of Columbia statutes.
29-801.05

Powers.

A limited liability company shall have the capacity to sue and be sued in its own name and the power to do all things necessary or convenient to carry on its activities and affairs.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(h)(2)(D), 59 DCR 13171
This section is referenced in § 29-801.07.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 substituted “activities and affairs” for “activities.”

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 105 of the Uniform Limited Company Act (2006 Act).

Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.